Tables/Contraction/zh-tw.cti
always \u7B50 123-456-3
always \u7B51 1-34-5
always \u7B52 124-12346-4
always \u7B53 13-16-3
always \u7B54 145-345-2
always \u7B55 15-13456-2
always \u7B56 245-2346-5
always \u7B57 1-12346-5
always \u7B58 123-12356-5
always \u7B59 14-2456-2
always \u7B5A 135-16-5
always \u7B5B 24-2456-3
always \u7B5C 145-1346-3
always \u7B5D 1-1356-3
always \u7B5E 245-2346-5
always \u7B5F 12345-34-3
always \u7B60 256-2
always \u7B61 124-34-2
always \u7B62 1234-345-2
always \u7B63 14-16-2
always \u7B64 14-1346-2
always \u7B65 13-1256-4
always \u7B66 13-12456-4
always \u7B67 13-2345-4
always \u7B68 1235-1236-2
always \u7B69 124-12346-4
always \u7B6A 15-23456-2
always \u7B6B 1-156-5
always \u7B6C 12-1356-2
always \u7B6D 15-12456-5
always \u7B6E 24-156-5
always \u7B6F 1-34-5
always \u7B70 125-25-2
always \u7B71 15-246-4
always \u7B72 24-146-3
always \u7B73 124-13456-2
always \u7B74 13-23456-2
always \u7B75 2345-2
always \u7B76 13-146-4
always \u7B77 123-2356-5
always \u7B78 13-1236-3
always \u7B79 12-12356-2
always \u7B7A 123-456-3
always \u7B7B 13-1346-5
always \u7B7C 256-2
always \u7B7D 25-3
always \u7B7E 245-2345-3
always \u7B7F 15-246-4
always \u7B80 13-2345-4
always \u7B81 1234-34-2
always \u7B82 14-2456-2
always \u7B83 125-12356-3
always \u7B84 1234-2456-2
always \u7B85 135-16-5
always \u7B86 135-16-5
always \u7B87 13-2346-5
always \u7B88 12-156-2
always \u7B89 13-2356-4
always \u7B8A 1256-3
always \u7B8B 13-2345-3
always \u7B8C 1-146-5
always \u7B8D 13-34-3
always \u7B8E 12-156-2
always \u7B8F 1-1356-3
always \u7B90 245-13456-5
always \u7B91 24-345-5
always \u7B92 1-12356-4
always \u7B93 14-34-5
always \u7B94 135-126-2
always \u7B95 13-16-3
always \u7B96 14-1456-2
always \u7B97 15-12456-5
always \u7B98 13-256-5
always \u7B99 12345-34-2
always \u7B9A 1-345-2
always \u7B9B 13-34-3
always \u7B9C 123-12346-3
always \u7B9D 245-2345-2
always \u7B9E 245-45-3
always \u7B9F 13-256-5
always \u7BA0 12-1246-2
always \u7BA1 13-12456-4
always \u7BA2 45-3
always \u7BA3 245-2346-5
always \u7BA4 125-34-2
always \u7BA5 135-126-4
always \u7BA6 125-2346-2
always \u7BA7 245-346-5
always \u7BA8 124-25-5
always \u7BA9 14-25-2
always \u7BAA 145-1236-3
always \u7BAB 15-246-3
always \u7BAC 1245-25-5
always \u7BAD 13-2345-5
always \u7BAE 15-45-3
always \u7BAF 135-2345-3
always \u7BB0 15-123456-4
always \u7BB1 15-46-3
always \u7BB2 15-2345-4
always \u7BB3 1234-13456-2
always \u7BB4 1-136-3
always \u7BB5 24-1356-4
always \u7BB6 1235-34-2
always \u7BB7 24-156-3
always \u7BB8 1-34-5
always \u7BB9 236-3
always \u7BBA 12-123456-4
always \u7BBB 14-1256-5
always \u7BBC 34-3
always \u7BBD 145-12346-4
always \u7BBE 24-25-5
always \u7BBF 13-16-2
always \u7BC0 13-346-2
always \u7BC1 1235-456-2
always \u7BC2 15-13456-3
always \u7BC3 134-356-5
always \u7BC4 12345-1236-5
always \u7BC5 12-1246-2
always \u7BC6 1-12456-5
always \u7BC7 1234-2345-3
always \u7BC8 12345-1356-3
always \u7BC9 1-34-2
always \u7BCA 1235-12346-2
always \u7BCB 245-346-5
always \u7BCC 1235-12356-2
always \u7BCD 245-234-3
always \u7BCE 134-246-4
always \u7BCF 245-2345-5
always \u7BD0 13-34-3
always \u7BD1 123-1246-5
always \u7BD2 24-156-2
always \u7BD3 14-12356-4
always \u7BD4 256-2
always \u7BD5 1235-2346-2
always \u7BD6 124-1346-2
always \u7BD7 236-5
always \u7BD8 12-12356-3
always \u7BD9 13-146-3
always \u7BDA 12345-356-4
always \u7BDB 1245-25-5
always \u7BDC 1-1356-3
always \u7BDD 13-12356-3
always \u7BDE 1345-346-5
always \u7BDF 245-2345-5
always \u7BE0 15-246-4
always \u7BE1 245-12456-5
always \u7BE2 13-12346-3
always \u7BE3 1234-1346-2
always \u7BE4 145-34-4
always \u7BE5 14-16-5
always \u7BE6 135-16-5
always \u7BE7 1-25-2
always \u7BE8 12-34-2
always \u7BE9 24-2456-3
always \u7BEA 12-156-2
always \u7BEB 1-34-2
always \u7BEC 245-46-3
always \u7BED 14-12346-2
always \u7BEE 14-1236-2
always \u7BEF 13-2345-3
always \u7BF0 135-34-5
always \u7BF1 14-16-2
always \u7BF2 1235-1246-5
always \u7BF3 135-16-5
always \u7BF4 145-16-2
always \u7BF5 245-12346-3
always \u7BF6 2345-3
always \u7BF7 1234-1356-2
always \u7BF8 125-1236-3
always \u7BF9 1-12456-5
always \u7BFA 1234-2456-2
always \u7BFB 1234-246-4
always \u7BFC 145-12356-3
always \u7BFD 1256-4
always \u7BFE 134-346-5
always \u7BFF 124-12456-2
always \u7C00 125-2346-2
always \u7C01 24-2456-3
always \u7C02 13-25-2
always \u7C03 16-2
always \u7C04 1235-34-5
always \u7C05 12-1236-4
always \u7C06 123-12356-5
always \u7C07 245-34-5
always \u7C08 1234-13456-2
always \u7C09 12-12356-5
always \u7C0A 13-16-3
always \u7C0B 13-1246-4
always \u7C0C 15-34-5
always \u7C0D 14-12356-4
always \u7C0E 245-25-5
always \u7C0F 14-34-5
always \u7C10 1345-2345-4
always \u7C11 15-25-3
always \u7C12 245-12456-5
always \u7C13 145-246-3
always \u7C14 15-25-3
always \u7C15 14-2346-5
always \u7C16 145-12456-5
always \u7C17 14-46-4
always \u7C18 15-246-3
always \u7C19 135-126-2
always \u7C1A 134-16-5
always \u7C1B 15-156-3
always \u7C1C 145-1346-5
always \u7C1D 14-246-2
always \u7C1E 145-1236-3
always \u7C1F 145-2345-5
always \u7C20 12345-34-4
always \u7C21 13-2345-4
always \u7C22 134-1456-4
always \u7C23 123-1246-5
always \u7C24 145-2456-5
always \u7C25 13-246-3
always \u7C26 145-1356-3
always \u7C27 1235-456-2
always \u7C28 15-123456-4
always \u7C29 14-146-2
always \u7C2A 125-1236-3
always \u7C2B 15-246-3
always \u7C2C 14-34-5
always \u7C2D 24-156-5
always \u7C2E 125-1236-3
always \u7C2F 245-16-4
always \u7C30 1234-2456-2
always \u7C31 245-16-2
always \u7C32 1234-2456-2
always \u7C33 13-1236-4
always \u7C34 13-1256-5
always \u7C35 145-34-5
always \u7C36 14-34-5
always \u7C37 2345-2
always \u7C38 135-126-4
always \u7C39 145-1346-3
always \u7C3A 15-2456-5
always \u7C3B 1-35-3
always \u7C3C 14-12346-2
always \u7C3D 245-2345-3
always \u7C3E 14-2345-2
always \u7C3F 135-34-5
always \u7C40 1-12356-5
always \u7C41 14-2456-5
always \u7C42 24-156-5
always \u7C43 14-1236-2
always \u7C44 123-1246-5
always \u7C45 1256-2
always \u7C46 236-5
always \u7C47 1235-146-2
always \u7C48 1-136-3
always \u7C49 124-2456-2
always \u7C4A 124-16-5
always \u7C4B 1345-346-5
always \u7C4C 12-12356-2
always \u7C4D 13-16-2
always \u7C4E 16-2
always \u7C4F 245-16-2
always \u7C50 124-1356-2
always \u7C51 1-12456-5
always \u7C52 1-12356-5
always \u7C53 12345-1236-3
always \u7C54 15-12356-4
always \u7C55 1-12356-5
always \u7C56 245-2345-3
always \u7C57 1-25-2
always \u7C58 124-1356-2
always \u7C59 14-34-5
always \u7C5A 14-34-2
always \u7C5B 13-2345-3
always \u7C5C 124-25-5
always \u7C5D 13456-2
always \u7C5E 1256-5
always \u7C5F 14-2456-5
always \u7C60 14-12346-2
always \u7C61 245-346-5
always \u7C62 14-2345-2
always \u7C63 14-1236-2
always \u7C64 245-2345-3
always \u7C65 236-5
always \u7C66 1-12346-3
always \u7C67 245-1256-2
always \u7C68 14-2345-2
always \u7C69 135-2345-3
always \u7C6A 145-12456-5
always \u7C6B 125-12456-4
always \u7C6C 14-16-2
always \u7C6D 15-156-3
always \u7C6E 14-25-2
always \u7C6F 13456-2
always \u7C70 236-5
always \u7C71 1-25-2
always \u7C72 1256-5
always \u7C73 134-16-4
always \u7C74 145-16-2
always \u7C75 12345-1236-2
always \u7C76 24-136-3
always \u7C77 1-2346-2
always \u7C78 24-136-3
always \u7C79 1345-1256-4
always \u7C7A 15-346-2
always \u7C7B 14-356-5
always \u7C7C 15-2345-3
always \u7C7D 125-156-4
always \u7C7E 1345-16-2
always \u7C7F 245-123456-5
always \u7C80 1-1346-5
always \u7C81 245-2345-3
always \u7C82 1-2456-3
always \u7C83 135-16-4
always \u7C84 135-1236-4
always \u7C85 34-5
always \u7C86 24-345-3
always \u7C87 123-1346-3
always \u7C88 1245-12356-2
always \u7C89 12345-136-4
always \u7C8A 135-16-5
always \u7C8B 245-1246-5
always \u7C8C 1456-4
always \u7C8D 14-16-2
always \u7C8E 12-156-4
always \u7C8F 124-2456-5
always \u7C90 123-34-5
always \u7C91 135-345-3
always \u7C92 14-16-5
always \u7C93 13-1236-3
always \u7C94 13-1256-5
always \u7C95 1234-126-5
always \u7C96 134-126-5
always \u7C97 245-34-3
always \u7C98 1345-2345-2
always \u7C99 1-12356-5
always \u7C9A 14-16-2
always \u7C9B 15-34-5
always \u7C9C 124-246-5
always \u7C9D 14-16-5
always \u7C9E 15-16-3
always \u7C9F 15-34-5
always \u7CA0 1235-12346-2
always \u7CA1 124-12346-2
always \u7CA2 125-156-3
always \u7CA3 245-2346-5
always \u7CA4 236-5
always \u7CA5 1-12356-3
always \u7CA6 14-1456-2
always \u7CA7 1-456-3
always \u7CA8 135-2456-4
always \u7CA9 14-146-3
always \u7CAA 12345-136-5
always \u7CAB 156-2
always \u7CAC 245-1256-3
always \u7CAD 1235-2346-2
always \u7CAE 14-46-2
always \u7CAF 15-2345-5
always \u7CB0 12345-34-3
always \u7CB1 14-46-2
always \u7CB2 245-1236-5
always \u7CB3 13-13456-3
always \u7CB4 14-16-4
always \u7CB5 236-5
always \u7CB6 14-34-5
always \u7CB7 13-1256-2
always \u7CB8 245-16-2
always \u7CB9 245-1246-5
always \u7CBA 135-2456-5
always \u7CBB 1-1346-3
always \u7CBC 14-1456-2
always \u7CBD 125-12346-5
always \u7CBE 13-13456-3
always \u7CBF 13-25-4
always \u7CC0 1235-35-3
always \u7CC1 15-1236-4
always \u7CC2 15-1236-4
always \u7CC3 124-1346-2
always \u7CC4 135-2345-3
always \u7CC5 1245-12356-4
always \u7CC6 134-2345-5
always \u7CC7 1235-12356-2
always \u7CC8 15-1256-4
always \u7CC9 125-12346-5
always \u7CCA 1235-34-2
always \u7CCB 13-2345-5
always \u7CCC 125-1236-2
always \u7CCD 245-156-2
always \u7CCE 138-12346-3-123458-136-3
always \u7CCF 15-346-5
always \u7CD0 12345-34-3
always \u7CD1 1345-16-5
always \u7CD2 135-356-5
always \u7CD3 13-34-4
always \u7CD4 15-234-4
always \u7CD5 13-146-3
always \u7CD6 124-1346-2
always \u7CD7 245-234-4
always \u7CD8 13-23456-3
always \u7CD9 245-146-3
always \u7CDA 1-456-3
always \u7CDB 124-1346-2
always \u7CDC 134-16-2
always \u7CDD 15-1236-4
always \u7CDE 12345-136-5
always \u7CDF 125-146-3
always \u7CE0 123-1346-3
always \u7CE1 13-46-5
always \u7CE2 134-126-2
always \u7CE3 15-1236-4
always \u7CE4 15-1236-4
always \u7CE5 1345-25-5
always \u7CE6 15-16-3
always \u7CE7 14-46-2
always \u7CE8 13-46-5
always \u7CE9 123-2356-5
always \u7CEA 135-126-2
always \u7CEB 1235-12456-2
always \u7CEC 24-34-4
always \u7CED 125-12346-5
always \u7CEE 15-2345-5
always \u7CEF 1345-25-5
always \u7CF0 124-12456-2
always \u7CF1 1345-346-5
always \u7CF2 14-16-5
always \u7CF3 125-25-5
always \u7CF4 145-16-2
always \u7CF5 1345-346-5
always \u7CF6 124-246-5
always \u7CF7 14-1236-2
always \u7CF8 134-16-5
always \u7CF9 134-16-5
always \u7CFA 13-234-3
always \u7CFB 15-16-5
always \u7CFC 13-12346-3
always \u7CFD 1-1356-4
always \u7CFE 13-234-3
always \u7CFF 234-5
always \u7D00 13-16-5
always \u7D01 12-345-5
always \u7D02 1-12356-5
always \u7D03 15-256-2
always \u7D04 236-3
always \u7D05 1235-12346-2
always \u7D06 1256-3
always \u7D07 1235-2346-2
always \u7D08 12456-2
always \u7D09 1245-136-5
always \u7D0A 123456-5
always \u7D0B 123456-2
always \u7D0C 245-234-2
always \u7D0D 1345-345-5
always \u7D0E 125-156-3
always \u7D0F 124-12356-4
always \u7D10 1345-234-4
always \u7D11 12345-12356-2
always \u7D12 13-16-5
always \u7D13 24-34-3
always \u7D14 12-123456-2
always \u7D15 1234-16-3
always \u7D16 1-136-5
always \u7D17 24-345-3
always \u7D18 1235-12346-2
always \u7D19 1-156-4
always \u7D1A 13-16-2
always \u7D1B 12345-136-3
always \u7D1C 256-2
always \u7D1D 1245-136-5
always \u7D1E 145-1236-4
always \u7D1F 13-1456-3
always \u7D20 15-34-5
always \u7D21 12345-1346-4
always \u7D22 15-25-4
always \u7D23 245-1246-5
always \u7D24 13-234-4
always \u7D25 125-345-3
always \u7D26 135-345-3
always \u7D27 13-1456-4
always \u7D28 12345-34-5
always \u7D29 1-156-5
always \u7D2A 245-156-4
always \u7D2B 125-156-4
always \u7D2C 12-12356-2
always \u7D2D 1235-12346-2
always \u7D2E 125-345-3
always \u7D2F 14-356-5
always \u7D30 15-16-5
always \u7D31 12345-34-2
always \u7D32 15-346-5
always \u7D33 24-136-3
always \u7D34 135-356-5
always \u7D35 1-34-5
always \u7D36 245-1256-4
always \u7D37 14-13456-2
always \u7D38 1-34-5
always \u7D39 24-146-5
always \u7D3A 13-1236-5
always \u7D3B 46-3
always \u7D3C 12345-34-2
always \u7D3D 124-25-2
always \u7D3E 1-136-4
always \u7D3F 145-2456-5
always \u7D40 12-34-5
always \u7D41 24-156-3
always \u7D42 1-12346-3
always \u7D43 15-2345-2
always \u7D44 125-34-4
always \u7D45 13-13456-4
always \u7D46 135-1236-5
always \u7D47 245-1256-2
